test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-arrw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - arrõ: # Verb 50 'eng /est arvata/fin' - full paradigm
     arrõ+V+Inf: arrõ
     arrõ+V+Ger: arrõs
     arrõ+V+Sup: arrõm
     arrõ+V+Sup+Ine: arrõmõs
     arrõ+V+Sup+Ela: arrõmõst
     arrõ+V+Sup+Tra: arrõmõks
     arrõ+V+Sup+Abe: arrõmõt
     arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: arrõb
     arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: arrõt
     arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: arrõbõd
     arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: arriz
     arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [arrizt, arriztõ]
     arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [arrizt, arriztõ]
     arrõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ar
     arrõ+V+Cond+Sg3: arrõks
     arrõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ar
     arrõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ar
     arrõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: arrõgid
     arrõ+V+Jus+Sg3: arrõg
     arrõ+V+Quo+Sg3: arriji
     arrõ+V+ActPrfPrc: arrõn
     arrõ+V+PssPrfPrc: ardõd
